Washington statutes.
RCW 43.117.090

Hearings—Information to be furnished to commission.

(1) The commission may for the purpose of carrying out the purposes of this chapter hold such public hearings, sit and act at such times and places, take such testimony, and receive such evidence, as the commission may deem advisable. The commission may administer oaths or affirmations to witnesses appearing before it. At least five members of the commission must be present to conduct a hearing.

(2) The commission may secure directly from any department or agency of the state information necessary to enable it to carry out the purposes of this chapter. Upon request of the chair of the commission, the head of such department or agency shall furnish such information to the commission.

[ 2009 c 549 s 5173; 1974 ex.s. c 140 s 9.]